Missouri, session 2026, SB1619.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 41.942 and 105.270, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 41.942 and 105.270, to read as follows:
41.942. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection 1 of section 105.270, any officer or employee of
this state, or of any department or agency of this state, or
of any county, municipality, school district or other
political subdivision, and any other public employee of this
state, who is or may become a member of the National Guard
or of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the
United States and who is engaged in the performance of duty
in the service of the United States under competent orders
for an extended and indefinite period of time, shall be
entitled to leave of absence from his or her respective
duties as a public officer or employee until such military
service is completed without loss of position, seniority,
accumulated leave, impairment of performance appraisal, pay
status, work schedule including shift, working days and days
off assigned to the officer or employee at the time leave
commences, and any other right or benefit to which the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1619 2
officer or employee is entitled, and no retirement benefit
shall be diminished or eliminated because of such service.
2. The officer or employee shall file with the
appointing authority or supervising agency an official order
from the appropriate military authority as evidence of such
duty for which the leave of absence is granted.
3. A volunteer firefighter, as defined in section
320.333, shall be entitled to all protections of this
section applicable to public employees other than
protections relating to monetary compensation, as defined in
section 320.333.
105.270. 1. All officers and employees of this state,
or of any department or agency thereof, or of any county,
municipality, school district, or other political
subdivision, and all other public employees of this state
who are or may become members of the National Guard or of
any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United
States, shall be entitled to leave of absence from their
respective duties, without loss of time, pay, regular leave,
impairment of efficiency rating, or of any other rights or
benefits, to which otherwise entitled, for all periods of
military services during which they are engaged in the
performance of duty or training in the service of this state
at the call of the governor and as ordered by the adjutant
general without regard to length of time, and for all
periods of military services during which they are engaged
in the performance of duty in the service of the United
States under competent orders for a period not to exceed a
total of [one hundred twenty hours] thirty-eight working
days in any federal fiscal year.
2. Before any payment of salary is made covering the
period of the leave the officer or the employee shall file

SB 1619 3
with the appointing authority or supervising agency an
official order from the appropriate military authority as
evidence of such duty for which military leave pay is
granted which order shall contain the certification of the
officer or employee's commanding officer of performance of
duty in accordance with the terms of such order.
3. No member of the organized militia shall be
discharged from employment by any of the aforementioned
agencies because of being a member of the organized militia,
nor shall he or she be hindered or prevented from performing
any militia service he or she may be called upon to perform
by proper authority nor otherwise be discriminated against
or dissuaded from enlisting or continuing his or her service
in the militia by threat or injury to him or her in respect
to his or her employment. Any officer or agent of the
aforementioned agencies violating any of the provisions of
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other
administrative rule or law to the contrary, any person
entitled to military leave pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section shall only be charged military
leave for any hours which that person would otherwise have
been required to work had it not been for such military
leave. The minimum charge for military leave shall be one
hour and additional charges for military leave shall be in
multiples of the minimum charge.
✓